Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 3

Residential Admission

33-5-301. Part definitions — Admission to developmental center — Emergency respite admission — Review.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Emergency respite admission” means an admission for up to forty-five (45) days authorized due to an emergency situation that results in the temporary inability of the person who has the care, custody, and control of a person with intellectual or developmental disability to provide proper care, custody, and control;

“Regular voluntary admission” means an admission authorized by a statewide admission review committee for a specified period of time;

“Respite admission” means an admission for up to forty-five (45) days authorized solely for the purpose of providing a respite for the person having responsibility for the care, custody, and control of a person with intellectual or developmental disability; and

“Short-term training admission” means an admission authorized by a written agreement between a developmental center and an applicant that the center provide services and supports for a person with intellectual or developmental disability to learn how to perform a certain function or functions for a specified period of time, not exceeding six (6) months, at the end of which the center will discharge the person with intellectual or developmental disability to the care, custody, and control of the applicant.

Under department rules and pursuant to the direction of the statewide admission review committee, the chief officer or director of a center or the appointed designee of a developmental center, subject to the availability of suitable accommodations and the absence of a less restrictive alternative, may admit for diagnosis, care, training and treatment:

A person with intellectual or developmental disability who applies for voluntary admission and does not lack capacity to apply under § 33-3-218;

A child with intellectual or developmental disability whose parent or legal guardian applies for voluntary admission; or

An adult whose conservator applies for voluntary admission.

The departments of human services and children's services may apply for respite and emergency respite admission on behalf of a person with intellectual or developmental disability who is in their custody. Admissions to a developmental center under respite, emergency respite, or short-term training admission, or any combination of these, shall not exceed two hundred twenty-five (225) days within a twelve-month period from the first day of admission in any of the categories. A respite admission, emergency respite admission, short-term training admission, or combination of such admissions shall not be used to circumvent appearance before the statewide admission review committee when regular voluntary admission is actually sought or appropriate. No regular voluntary admission shall be based on the premise that it is for a lifetime.

The statewide admission review committee shall informally review a person's emergency respite admission within seven (7) days after the person is admitted. If the review is not done, then a hearing shall be held by the committee to review the propriety of the admission as in the case of regular voluntary admissions and shall make its decision within twenty-five (25) days after admission.

Upon receipt of an application for admission, the developmental center shall evaluate the person with intellectual or developmental disability to assess the person's need for services and supports and the least restrictive alternative available to provide appropriate services and supports to the person. If the evaluation results in a recommendation for a regular voluntary admission and there is an available suitable accommodation, the developmental center will report its findings and recommendations to the statewide admission review committee.

The department may adopt rules to implement the statewide admissions review committee and to specify its duties and membership.

Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1983, ch. 323, § 10; T.C.A., § 33-501; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 8; 1988, ch. 828, § 2; 1993, ch. 283, § 1; 1995, ch. 468, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-5-101(b); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2012, ch. 636, §§ 1-5.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-5-301 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A., § 33-505), concerning mental health and mental retardation services, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 809, § 2, effective May 24, 2000. For present law, see § 33-5-106.

Former chapter 5, §§ 33-5-101, 33-5-105, 33-5-201, 33-5-301 — 33-5-303, 33-5-305 — 33-5-310, 33-5-401 — 33-5-412 (Acts 1971, ch. 289, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 4; 1976, ch. 764, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 3; 1978, ch. 667, § 2; 1980, ch. 822, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 5, 6, 10; 1982, ch. 862, § 2; 1983, ch. 323, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 33-313, 33-501, 33-505 — 33-507, 33-510, 33-515, 33-516, 33-523, 33-524, 33-1601; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 6, 8-11; 1988, ch. 828, § 2; 1989, ch. 504, § 1; 1992, ch. 981, §§ 2-13, 15; 1992, ch. 991, § 14; 1993, ch. 283, § 1; 1994, ch. 683, § 1; 1995, ch. 468, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-5-102 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-502), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-103 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-503), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-104 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-504), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; and § 33-5-304 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1978, ch. 527, § 2; 1978, ch. 667, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-508), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Cross-References. Definitions applicable throughout title, § 33-1-101.

Collateral References.

Liability of one releasing institutionalized mental patient for harm he causes. 38 A.L.R.3d 699.

33-5-302. Periodic evaluation of admitted person — Discharge.

The chief officer or director of a center or the appointed designee:

Shall cause each person admitted under § 33-5-301 or transferred under § 33-3-301 or chapter 3, part 4 of this title to be evaluated as often as necessary, but not less often than every six (6) months;

Shall discharge a person admitted under § 33-5-301 when the chief officer, director or designee and the statewide admission review committee determine that the person no longer meets the standards under which the person was admitted; or

May discharge a person admitted under § 33-5-301 at any time when it is in the person’s best interest.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2012, ch. 636, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-5-302 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1981, ch. 224, § 5; T.C.A., § 33-506), concerning mental health and mental retardation services, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 809, § 2, effective May 24, 2000. For present law, see § 33-5-106.

Former chapter 5, §§ 33-5-101, 33-5-105, 33-5-201, 33-5-301 — 33-5-303, 33-5-305 — 33-5-310, 33-5-401 — 33-5-412 (Acts 1971, ch. 289, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 4; 1976, ch. 764, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 3; 1978, ch. 667, § 2; 1980, ch. 822, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 5, 6, 10; 1982, ch. 862, § 2; 1983, ch. 323, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 33-313, 33-501, 33-505 — 33-507, 33-510, 33-515, 33-516, 33-523, 33-524, 33-1601; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 6, 8-11; 1988, ch. 828, § 2; 1989, ch. 504, § 1; 1992, ch. 981, §§ 2-13, 15; 1992, ch. 991, § 14; 1993, ch. 283, § 1; 1994, ch. 683, § 1; 1995, ch. 468, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-5-102 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-502), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-103 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-503), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-104 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-504), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; and § 33-5-304 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1978, ch. 527, § 2; 1978, ch. 667, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-508), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-5-303. Request for discharge by parent or other representative.

In the case of a person admitted under § 33-5-301, a parent or legal guardian of a child with intellectual or development disability on behalf of the child, a conservator of a person with intellectual or development disability on behalf of the person, or a person with intellectual or development disability who was admitted on the person's own application and does not lack capacity under § 33-3-218 may request discharge from a developmental center at any time by filing a request with the chief officer or director of a center or the appointed designee. If the person cannot file a written request, anyone acting on the person's behalf may file the request with the person's consent. The chief officer or director of a center or the appointed designee shall discharge the person with intellectual or development disability within twelve (12) hours after receipt of the request or at the time stated in the request, whichever is later.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2012, ch. 636, §§ 7, 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-5-303 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1981, ch. 224, § 6; T.C.A., § 33-507), concerning mental health and mental retardation services, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 809, § 2, effective May 24, 2000. For present law, see § 33-5-106.

Former chapter 5, §§ 33-5-101, 33-5-105, 33-5-201, 33-5-301 — 33-5-303, 33-5-305 — 33-5-310, 33-5-401 — 33-5-412 (Acts 1971, ch. 289, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 4; 1976, ch. 764, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 3; 1978, ch. 667, § 2; 1980, ch. 822, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 5, 6, 10; 1982, ch. 862, § 2; 1983, ch. 323, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 33-313, 33-501, 33-505 — 33-507, 33-510, 33-515, 33-516, 33-523, 33-524, 33-1601; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 6, 8-11; 1988, ch. 828, § 2; 1989, ch. 504, § 1; 1992, ch. 981, §§ 2-13, 15; 1992, ch. 991, § 14; 1993, ch. 283, § 1; 1994, ch. 683, § 1; 1995, ch. 468, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-5-102 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-502), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-103 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-503), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-104 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-504), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; and § 33-5-304 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1978, ch. 527, § 2; 1978, ch. 667, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-508), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-5-304. Departmental review of admission.

The department may review the appropriateness of admission to a privately or publicly funded residential facility for persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities due to mental impairment. The department shall investigate to assess the validity of an allegation of:

Deprivation of liberty without consent;

Abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

Placement that is inappropriate to meet the needs of a service recipient;

Violation of a fiduciary relationship; or

Any other violation of a right.

If the department finds probable cause to believe the allegation after an investigation by inspection of records and interviews with personnel, service recipients and their families and there is no suitable remedy under chapter 2, part 4 of this title, the department may require a plan of compliance or may require independent review of admissions under this section for a period of time set by the department.

Within five (5) days after a recommendation is made that a person with intellectual or developmental disability be admitted to a residential facility for which the department requires independent review under subsection (a), an independent reviewer designated by the department shall determine the appropriateness of the recommended residential service for the person on the basis of the interests and welfare of the person. The reviewer's decision shall not be influenced by any benefits flowing from the admission solely to the family, parents, guardian, or conservator of the person. The reviewer's decision shall be written and shall state the reasons for the decision.

The reviewer's decision on publicly funded placements may be appealed to a designee of the commissioner by filing the appeal within seven (7) days after receipt of the decision. The designee of the commissioner shall review and decide the appeal within fourteen (14) days after receipt of the appeal. The only appeal of the reviewer's decision on privately funded placements is a request for reconsideration by the reviewer filed within fourteen (14) days after receipt of the decision, and the reviewer's decision is final administratively. If granted, reconsideration by the reviewer shall occur within five (5) working days after receipt of the request.

The department shall designate persons from among its employees or by contract to serve as independent reviewers. A person designated to serve as the independent reviewer for a case shall have no conflict of interest with any party to the case and shall be trained with respect to the laws, rules, and information required to make competent decisions as an independent reviewer.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 28; 2012, ch. 636, § 9.